South Dakota, session 2026, SB76.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-15-6 be AMENDED:
11-15-6. The authority shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
specifying the criteria and process for the application, approval, and disbursement of:
(1) Loans and grants provided in accordance with §§ 11-15-1 to 11-15-5, inclusive,
and § 11-15-7;
(2) Loans provided in accordance with § 11-15-8; and
(3) Loans provided in accordance with section 2 of this Act.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-15:
In addition to any other loan authorized in § 11-15-2, the authority may provide
loans from the South Dakota housing infrastructure fund, created in § 11-15-2, to the
owner or operator of an airport with scheduled air service located in this state and in a
metropolitan statistical area with an estimated annual resident population of at least one
hundred twenty-five thousand, determined as of July 1, 2024, by the United States Census
Bureau.
Loans provided under this section:
(1) Are for the purpose of improving or maintaining airport infrastructure;
(2) May not exceed fifteen million dollars per recipient; and
(3) Are subject to the terms set forth in section 3 of this Act.
The authority shall consider, and authorize or deny, any loan requested pursuant
to this section at a public meeting held pursuant to chapter 1-25.

26.567.27 2 76
All moneys received by the authority in repayment of a loan made pursuant to this
section must be deposited in the South Dakota housing infrastructure fund and used for
making new loans pursuant to § 11-15-2.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-15:
A loan made pursuant to section 2 of this Act must:
(1) Bear interest payable at the rate of two percent per year;
(2) Be unsecured;
(3) Require equal annual payments based on a twenty-year amortization;
(4) Require that the first payment be due one year from the date of the funding of the
loan; and
(5) Be closed and funded on or before June 30, 2030.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-15:
A loan made pursuant to section 2 of this Act to a municipality is exempt from the
provisions of chapters 6-8B and 9-25, but the loan is subject to the constitutional
limitations of municipal indebtedness.
A loan made pursuant to section 2 of this Act to a regional airport authority, created
pursuant to chapter 50-6A, is exempt from the provisions of §§ 50-6A-29 to 50-6A-37,
inclusive.
SB76 ENROLLED

26.567.27 3 76
An Act to authorize loans from the South Dakota housing infrastructure fund for airport
infrastructure.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 76
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 76 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB76 ENROLLED